Utah statutes.
54-5-1.5.   Special regulation fee -- Supplemental Levy Committee --
Supplemental fee -- Fee for electrical cooperatives.
(1) (a)  A special fee to defray the cost of regulation is imposed upon all
public utilities subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission.
(b)  The special fee is in addition to any charge now assessed, levied, or
required by law.
(2) (a)  The executive director of the Department of Commerce shall determine
the special fee for the Department of Commerce.
(b)  The chair of the Public Service Commission shall determine the special
fee for the Public Service Commission.
(c)  The fee shall be assessed as a uniform percentage of the gross operating
revenue for the preceding calendar year derived from each public utility's
business and operations during that period within this state, excluding income
derived from interstate business.  Gross operating revenue shall not include
income to a wholesale electric cooperative derived from the sale of power to a
rural electric cooperative which resells that power within the state.
(3) (a)  The executive director of the Department of Commerce shall notify
each public utility subject to the provisions of this chapter of the amount of
the fee.
(b)  The fee is due and payable on or before July 1 of each year.
(4) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the public utilities provide
all of the funds for the administration, support, and maintenance of:
(i)  the Public Service Commission;
(ii)  state agencies within the Department of Commerce involved in the
regulation of public utilities; and
(iii)  expenditures by the attorney general for utility regulation.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), the fee imposed by Subsection (1)
shall not exceed the greater of:
(i) (A)  for a public utility other than an electrical cooperative, .3% of the
public utility's gross operating revenues for the preceding calendar year; or
(B)  for an electrical cooperative, .15% of the electrical cooperative's gross
operating revenues for the preceding calendar year; or
(ii)  $50.
(5) (a)  There is created a Supplemental Levy Committee to levy additional
assessments on public utilities when unanticipated costs of regulation occur
in any fiscal year.
(b)  The Supplemental Levy Committee shall consist of:
(i)  one member selected by the executive director of the Department of
Commerce;
(ii)  one member selected by the chairman of the Public Service Commission;
(iii)  two members selected by the three public utilities that paid the
largest percent of the current regulatory fee; and
(iv)  one member selected by the four appointed members.
(c) (i)  The members of the Supplemental Levy Committee shall be selected
within 10 working days after the executive director of the Department of
Commerce gives written notice to the Public Service Commission and the public
utilities that a supplemental levy committee is needed.
(ii)  If the members of the Supplemental Levy Committee have not been
appointed within the time prescribed, the governor shall appoint the members
of the Supplemental Levy Committee.
(d) (i)  During any state fiscal year, the Supplemental Levy Committee, by a
majority vote and subject to audit by the state auditor, may impose a
supplemental fee on the regulated utilities for the purpose of defraying any
increased cost of regulation.
(ii)  The supplemental fee imposed upon the utilities shall equal a percentage
of their gross operating revenue for the preceding calendar year.
(iii)  The aggregate of all fees, including any supplemental fees assessed,
shall not exceed .3% of the gross operating revenue of the utilities assessed
for the preceding calendar year.
(iv)  Payment of the supplemental fee is due within 30 days after receipt of
the assessment.
(v)  The utility may, within 10 days after receipt of assessment, request a
hearing before the Public Service Commission if it questions the need for, or
the reasonableness of, the supplemental fee.
(e) (i)  Any supplemental fee collected to defray the cost of regulation shall
be transferred to the state treasurer as a departmental collection according
to the provisions of Section 63J-1-104.
(ii)  Supplemental fees are excess collections, credited according to the
procedures of Section 63J-1-104.
(iii)  Charges billed to the Department of Commerce by any other state
department, institution, or agency for services rendered in connection with
regulation of a utility shall be credited by the state treasurer from the
special or supplemental fees collected to the appropriations account of the
entity providing that service according to the procedures provided in Title
63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act.
(6) (a)  For purposes of this section, "electrical cooperative" means:
(i)  a distribution electrical cooperative; or
(ii)  a wholesale electrical cooperative.
(b)  Subject to Subsection (6)(c), if the regulation of one or more electrical
cooperatives causes unanticipated costs of regulation in a fiscal year, the
commission may impose a supplemental fee on the one or more electrical
cooperatives in this state responsible for the increased cost of regulation.
(c)  The aggregate of all fees imposed under this section on an electrical
cooperative in a calendar year shall not exceed the greater of:
(i)  .3% of the electrical cooperative's gross operating revenues for the
preceding calendar year; or
(ii)  $50.
